Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB924.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly hereby establishes the Kentucky Public Service Student
Loan Forgiveness Program to encourage and assist individuals in pursuing or
remaining in public service professions.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(b) "Eligible student loan" means a federally guaranteed student loan under
the Federal Family Education Loan Program or Federal Direct Loan
Program;
(c) "Public service" means employment with the Commonwealth of Kentucky,
any county, city, political subdivision, or department, board, agency,
commission or authority thereof, a public school district, public university,
or any qualifying nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under
26 U. S. C. sec. 501(c)(3) providing direct public services; and
(d) "Program agreement" means a contract entered into between the authority
and an eligible applicant for purposes of this section.
(3) (a) There is hereby established a Kentucky Public Service Student Loan
Forgiveness Program fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of
providing assistance in the repayment of eligible student loans to
individuals employed in a public service profession serving the citizens of
Kentucky.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the authority and shall consist of state
appropriations, gifts and grants from public and private sources, and
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 8:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1979
federal funds.
(c) Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested as
provided in KRS 42.500. Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
(4) To be considered eligible for the program, an individual shall:
(a) Reside in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(b) Maintain full-time employment in a position of public service located in the
Commonwealth of Kentucky, excluding an office filled by election;
(c) Not be in default on any program under the Title IV of the Higher
Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1001 et seq., as amended, or any
obligation to the authority under any program administered by the
authority; and
(d) Submit an annual application that requires verification of public service
employment and the student loan.
(5) (a) Subject to the availability of funds, the authority shall award loan
repayment benefits to eligible applicants who are selected and who enter
into a program agreement. Recipients shall fulfill the requirements of the
agreement and comply with each of the following requirements while the
program agreement is in force:
1. Complete a minimum service commitment of two (2) years of full-time
eligible public service employment; and
2. Satisfy employment verification requirements.
(b) Failure to complete the service commitment may result in repayment
obligations or loss of remaining years of eligibility.
(6) (a) The authority shall administer the Kentucky Public Service Student Loan
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 8:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1979
Forgiveness Program and develop award criteria to include but not be
limited to methods to address critical shortage occupations, rural or
distressed counties, underserved regions, length of service commitment, and
income thresholds.
(b) Subject to the availability of funds, the authority shall disburse loan
repayment benefits between five thousand dollars ($5,000) and seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) to a selected program participant
after the completion of each twelve (12) month period of verified public
service employment, not to exceed a period of five (5) consecutive years; and
(c) The lifetime loan repayment benefit disbursed to the program participant
shall not exceed a total of forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or the amount
of the outstanding eligible student loan balance, whichever is less.
(7) The authority may establish criteria for an enhanced award to include but not be
limited to:
(a) Loan repayment benefit up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to a program
participant after completion of each twelve (12) month period of eligible
public service employment not to exceed a period of five (5) consecutive
years;
(b) The total loan repayment benefit disbursed to an enhanced award program
participant not to exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or the total loan
balances, whichever is less; and
(c) Develop selection criteria to address critical shortage of public service
professions, service to rural areas, designated distressed counties, health
professional shortage areas, and high-need school districts.
(8) The authority shall administer the Kentucky Public Service Student Loan
Forgiveness Program and shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for the administration of the program.
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 8:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1979
(9) (a) By November 1 of each year in which the Kentucky Public Service Student
Loan Forgiveness Program fund has a balance, the authority shall report to
the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue:
1. The total number of eligible participants and loan repayment benefit
participants;
2. The total number and type of occupations participating in the
program;
3. The geographic distribution of loan repayment benefit recipients;
4. Retention rates; and
5. Total funds disbursed.
(b) The annual report shall provide an analysis and evaluation of the program
as it relates to workforce retention, regional equity, the cost per retained
public servant, and the return on investment relative to workforce vacancy
rates.
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$30,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 from the budget reserve trust fund account
established by KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Public Service Student Loan Forgiveness
Program fund to provide assistance in the repayment of eligible student loans for public
service employees of the Commonwealth.
Section 3. There is hereby appropriated general fund moneys in the amount of
$30,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to the Kentucky Public Service Student Loan
Forgiveness Program fund to provide assistance in the repayment of eligible student loans
for public service employees of the Commonwealth.
Section 4. Whereas public service employees provide vital roles in the delivery
of critical and essential services in the Commonwealth, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 8:32 PM Jacketed